Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Kentucky Country Music Hall of Fame

153.520.
Designation of Kentucky Country Music Hall of Fame.

The Kentucky Country Music Hall of Fame, Inc., of Renfro Valley is hereby designated and declared as the Kentucky Country Music Hall of Fame.

History.
Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 67, § 1, effective July 15, 1988.